Washington statutes.
RCW 13.38.150

Consent to foster care placement or termination of parental rights—Withdrawal.

(1) If an Indian child's parent or Indian custodian voluntarily consents to a foster care placement of the child or to termination of parental rights, the consent is not valid unless executed in writing and recorded before a judge of a court of competent jurisdiction and accompanied by the judge's certificate that the terms and consequences of the consent were fully explained in detail and were fully understood by the parent or Indian custodian. The court must also certify that either the parent or Indian custodian fully understood the explanation in English or that it was interpreted into a language that the parent or Indian custodian understood. Any consent for release of custody given prior to, or within ten days after, the birth of the Indian child shall not be valid.

(2) An Indian child's parent or Indian custodian may withdraw consent to a voluntary foster care placement at any time and, upon the withdrawal of consent, the child shall be returned to the parent or Indian custodian.

(3) In a voluntary proceeding for termination of parental rights to, or adoptive placement of, an Indian child, the consent of the parent may be withdrawn for any reason at any time prior to the entry of an order terminating parental rights or a final decree of adoption, and the child shall be returned to the parent.

(4) After the entry of a final decree of adoption of an Indian child, the parent may withdraw consent to the adoption upon the grounds that consent was obtained through fraud or duress. Upon a finding that such consent was obtained through fraud or duress the court shall vacate the decree and return the child to the parent. No adoption which has been effective for at least two years may be invalidated under this section unless otherwise allowed by state law.

[ 2011 c 309 s 15.]